District of Columbia statutes.
1-623.02b

Functions — Disability compensation.

The functions of the program shall be to:

(1)

Establish appropriate systems and procedures for the reporting of occupational accidents and illnesses;

(2)

Maintain and analyze records of all occupational accidents and illnesses occurring within agencies;

(3)

Study safety problems and recommend actions to correct undesirable conditions or unsafe practices;

(4)

Monitor and evaluate adequacy and effectiveness of safety procedures and practices of District agencies through inspection;

(5)

Make determinations and awards for, or against payment of compensation under this chapter;

(6)

Pay compensation to employees for work related disability or death resulting from personal injury sustained in the performance of their duty, as specified in this section;

(7)

Conduct promotional campaigns to stimulate employees’ interest in accident prevention and to train and motivate supervisors in accident prevention concepts, practices and techniques;

(8)

Develop and maintain working agreements with designated physicians and other public or private organizations, as required; and

(9)

Monitor the adequacy and effectiveness of medical services under this section, and develop guidelines for the determination of disabilities and professional fees.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2302b
as added Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 1203(b), 48 DCR 6981

History

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 1103(b) of Fiscal Year 2002 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-124, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7861).

Emergency Legislation